District of Columbia statutes.
44-734

Asbestos abatement — Appropriations.

There may be appropriated out of revenues available to the District sums necessary to carry out the purposes of this subchapter.

Mar. 15, 1985, D.C. Law 5-173, § 5, 32 DCR 736
1981 Ed., § 32-119.4.